California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) Moneys in the account shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to plug and abandon oil and gas wells, decommission attendant facilities, or otherwise remediate sites that the supervisor determines could pose a danger to life, health, water quality, wildlife, or natural resources if there is no operator determined by the supervisor to be responsible for remediation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3237
 or who is able to respond.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3262.

The division may adopt regulations to implement this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.4. Regulation of Production Facilities [3270. - 3270.6.]

3270.

(a) The division shall, by regulation, prescribe minimum facility maintenance standards for all production facilities in the state. The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, standards for all of the following:

(1) Leak detection.

(2) Corrosion prevention and testing.

(3) Tank inspection and cleaning.

(4) Valve and gauge maintenance, and secondary containment maintenance.

(5) Other facility or equipment maintenance that the supervisor deems important for the proper operation of production facilities and that the supervisor determines are necessary to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources; damage to underground oil and gas deposits from infiltrating water and other causes; loss of oil, gas, or reservoir energy; and damage to underground and surface waters suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes by the infiltration of, or the addition of, detrimental substances.

(b) An operator who constructs, acquires, maintains, or alters an oil well or a production facility shall comply with the standards prescribed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) In a form and at a time prescribed by the division in regulation, an operator shall notify the supervisor of the construction, alteration, or decommissioning of a production facility.

(d) An operator shall maintain at the production facility’s local office records of maintenance and repair operations, tests, and inspections, and shall provide the supervisor with access to these records at all times during normal business hours and with copies of the records immediately, upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.1.

Within three months of its acquisition of a production facility or at the time of the initial production at its production facility, the facility operator shall file with the division a spill contingency plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.2.

The division shall inspect production facilities to ensure compliance with the standards prescribed in the regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3270.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.3.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the supervisor, upon his or her determination or that of the district deputy that a production facility is being operated in violation of the standards prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 3270, may issue a cease and desist order to a production facility operator requiring the operator to cease operation until the operator demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the supervisor, that the violation has been corrected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.4.

(a) In addition to the bonding requirements under Article 4 (commencing with Section 3200), for an operator with a history of violating this chapter or that has outstanding liabilities to the state associated with a well or production facility, the supervisor may require a life-of-well or life-of-production facility bond in an amount adequate to ensure all of the following:

(1) The proper plugging and abandonment of each well.

(2) The safe decommissioning of each production facility.

(3) The financing of spill response and incident cleanup.

(b) Upon the failure of an operator to properly plug and abandon a well, decommission a production facility, or perform the appropriate spill response and incident cleanup, the supervisor may levy on the bond to obtain money to pay the cost of the work.

(c) The supervisor may release a life-of-production facility bond upon the satisfactory decommissioning of a production facility, or when an operator has provided another valid life-of-production facility bond.

(d) The supervisor may release a life-of-well bond upon the satisfactory plugging and abandonment of all wells covered by the bond or when an operator has provided another valid life-of-well bond.

(e) Whenever an operator sells, assigns, transfers, conveys, exchanges, or otherwise disposes to another operator a well or production facility that is covered by a life-of-well bond or a life-of-production facility bond, the new operator shall replace the life-of-well or life-of-production bond, as applicable, and maintain the new bond for five years before it may be released by the supervisor.

(f) In lieu of the indemnity bond required by this section, the supervisor may accept a deposit given pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 995.710) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, excluding a deposit of money, bearer bonds, or bearer notes.

(g) The supervisor shall adopt regulations specifying the content, including the conditions, of the bond or other security instrument required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.5.

(a) (1) By January 1, 2018, the division shall review and evaluate, and update as appropriate, its existing regulations regarding all active
 gas pipelines
 that are four inches or less in diameter, located
 in sensitive areas, and 10 years old or older. The division shall make a written finding of its review and evaluation of these pipelines.

(2) In its review and evaluation, the division shall consider existing
 pipeline integrity, pipeline leak detection, and other pipeline assessment requirements imposed by other regulators to determine which of these forms of assessment meet the division’s needs.

(3) The regulations shall ensure the integrity and operation of these active gas pipelines pursuant to Sections 3106 and 3270.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2018, an operator of an active gas pipeline in a sensitive area shall submit to the division, as part of
 compliance with pipeline management plan requirements pursuant to Section 1774.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, an up-to-date and accurate map identifying the location of the pipeline and other up-to-date and accurate locational information of the pipeline as determined and in a format specified by the division.

(2) The division shall perform random periodic spot check inspections to ensure that the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) is accurately reported.

(3) The division shall maintain a list of active gas pipelines in sensitive areas.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following
 terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Active gas pipeline” means an inservice gas pipeline regardless of diameter that is within the division’s jurisdiction.

(2) “Sensitive area” means any of the following:

(A) An area containing a building intended for human occupancy, such as a residence, school, hospital, or business, that is located within 300 feet of an active gas pipeline and that is not necessary to the operation of the pipeline.

(B) An area determined by the supervisor to present significant potential threat to life, health, property, or natural resources in the event of a leak from an active gas pipeline.

(C) An area determined by the supervisor to have an active gas pipeline that has a history of chronic leaks.

(d) This section does not affect or limit the authority of the supervisor pursuant to Section 3106, 3270, or any other section of this code, or any regulation implementing those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 601, Sec. 3.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.6.

Upon the discovery of a leak from an active gas pipeline that is within a sensitive area, as defined in Section 3270.5, the owner or operator of the pipeline shall promptly notify the division and the local health officer, or his or her designee, of the jurisdiction in which the leak is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 601, Sec. 4.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Interstate Cooperation in Oil and Gas Conservation [3275. - 3277.]

3275.

The Legislature of the State of California hereby ratifies and approves “The Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas,” and the amendment, extension, and renewal thereof, as set forth in Section 3276. The provisions of the compact shall become the law of this state upon the compact becoming operative as provided in Article VIII of the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1335.)
-------------------------------------------

3276.

The provisions of the interstate compact referred to in Section 3275 are as follows:
An Agreement to Amend, Extend and Renew the Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas

Whereas, On the 16th day of February 1935, in the City of Dallas, Texas, there was executed “An Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas” which was thereafter formally ratified and approved by the States of Oklahoma, Texas, New Mexico, Illinois, Colorado and Kansas, the original of which is now on deposit with the Department of State of the United States;

Whereas, Effective as of September 1, 1971, the several compacting states deem it advisable to amend said compact so as to provide that upon the giving of congressional consent thereto in its amended form, said compact will remain in effect until Congress withdraws such consent;

Whereas, The original of said compact as so amended will, upon execution thereof, be deposited promptly with the Department of State of the United States, a true copy of which follows: 
 
An Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas
Article I
This agreement may become effective within any compacting state at any time as prescribed by that state, and shall become effective within those states ratifying it whenever any three of the States of Texas, Oklahoma, California, Kansas, and New Mexico have ratified and Congress has given its consent. Any oil-producing state may become a party hereto as hereinafter provided.
 
Article II
The purpose of this compact is to conserve oil and gas by the prevention of physical waste thereof from any cause.
 
Article III
Each state bound hereby agrees that within a reasonable time it will enact laws, or if the laws have been enacted, then it agrees to continue the same in force, to accomplish within reasonable limits the prevention of:

(a) The operation of any oil well with an inefficient gas-oil ratio.

(b) The drowning with water of any stratum capable of producing oil or gas, or both oil and gas, in paying quantities.

(c) The avoidable escape into the open air or the wasteful burning of gas from a natural gas well.

(d) The creation of unnecessary fire hazards.

(e) The drilling, equipping, locating, spacing or operating of a well or wells so as to bring about physical waste of oil or gas or loss in the ultimate recovery thereof.

(f) The inefficient, excessive or improper use of the reservoir energy in producing any well.

The enumeration of the foregoing subjects shall not limit the scope of the authority of any state.
 
Article IV
Each state bound hereby agrees that it will, within a reasonable time, enact statutes, or if such statutes have been enacted then that it will continue the same in force, providing in effect that oil produced in violation of its valid oil and/or gas conservation statutes or any valid rule, order or regulation promulgated thereunder, shall be denied access to commerce; and providing for stringent penalties for the waste of either oil or gas. 
 
Article V
It is not the purpose of this compact to authorize the states joining herein to limit the production of oil or gas for the purpose of stabilizing or fixing the price thereof, or create or perpetuate monopoly, or to promote regimentation, but is limited to the purpose of conserving oil and gas and preventing the avoidable waste thereof within reasonable limitations.
 
Article VI
Each state joining herein shall appoint one representative to a commission hereby constituted and designated as The Interstate Oil Compact Commission, the duty of which said Commission shall be to make inquiry and ascertain from time to time such methods, practices, circumstances, and conditions as may be disclosed for bringing about conservation and the prevention of physical waste of oil and gas, and at such intervals as said Commission deems beneficial it shall report its findings and recommendations to the several states for adoption or rejection. 

The Commission shall have power to recommend the coordination of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their several jurisdictions to promote the maximum ultimate recovery from the petroleum reserves of said states, and to recommend measures for the maximum ultimate recovery of oil and gas. Said Commission shall organize and adopt suitable rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.

No action shall be taken by the Commission except: (1) By the affirmative votes of the majority of the whole number of the compacting states represented at any meeting, and (2) by a concurring vote of a majority in interest of the compacting states at said meeting, such interest to be determined as follows: Such vote of each state shall be in the decimal proportion fixed by the ratio of its daily average production during the preceding calendar half-year to the daily average production of the compacting states during said period.
 
Article VII
No state by joining herein shall become financially obligated to any other state, nor shall the breach of the terms hereof by any state subject such state to financial responsibility to the other states joining herein.
 
Article VIII
This compact shall continue in effect until Congress withdraws its consent. But any state joining herein may, upon sixty (60) days’ notice, withdraw herefrom.

The representatives of the signatory states have signed this agreement in a single original which shall be deposited in the archives of the Department of State of the United States, and a duly certified copy shall be forwarded to the Governor of each of the signatory states.

This compact shall become effective when ratified and approved as provided in Article I. Any oil-producing state may become a party thereto by affixing its signature to a counterpart to be similarly deposited, certified, and ratified.

Done in the City of Dallas, Texas, this sixteenth day of February, 1935.

Whereas, The said “Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas” in its initial form has heretofore been duly renewed and extended with the consent of the Congress to September 1, 1971; and

Whereas, It is desired to amend said “Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas” effective September 1, 1971, and to renew and extend said compact as so amended:

Now, therefore, this writing witnesseth:

It is hereby agreed that effective September 1, 1971, the Compact entitled “An Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas” executed within the City of Dallas, Texas, on the 16th day of February, 1935, and now on deposit with the Department of State of the United States, be and the same is hereby amended by amending the first paragraph of Article VII thereof to read as follows:“This compact shall continue in effect until Congress withdraws its consent. But any state joining herein may, upon sixty (60) days’ notice, withdraw herefrom.”and that said compact as so amended be, and the same is hereby renewed and extended. This agreement shall become effective when executed, ratified, and approved as provided in Article I of said compact as so amended.

The signatory States have executed this agreement in a single original which shall be deposited in the archives of the Department of State of the United States and a duly certified copy thereof shall be forwarded to the Governor of each of the signatory States. Any oil-producing State may become a party hereto by executing a counterpart of this agreement to be similarly deposited, certified, and ratified.

Executed by the several undersigned States, at their several State capitols, through their proper officials on the dates as shown, as duly authorized by statutes and resolutions, subject to the limitations and qualifications of the acts of the respective State Legislatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1335.)
-------------------------------------------

3277.

The Governor is hereby designated as the official representative of the State of California on the Interstate Oil Compact Commission provided for in the compact ratified by this article. The Governor shall exercise and perform for the State of California all the powers and duties imposed by the compact upon the representative to the Interstate Oil Compact Commission. The Director of Conservation is hereby designated to be the assistant representative and he or she shall act as the official representative of the State of California on the Interstate Oil Compact Commission when the authority to so act is delegated to him or her by the Governor. In his or her absence, the State Oil and Gas Supervisor is hereby designated to be the assistant representative. The Executive Officer of the State Lands Commission is hereby designated to be the associate representative. In addition, both the assistant representative and the associate representative shall perform such other duties as the Governor may designate which are necessary to enable the State of California to cooperate fully in accomplishing the objectives of the compact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. Health Protection Zones [3280. - 3291.]

3280.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Area” means surface area, and all measurement of distances is on the surface of the land.

(b) “Health protection zone” means the area within 3,200 feet of a sensitive receptor. The measurement shall be made from the property line of the receptor unless the receptor building is more than 50 feet set back from the property line, in which case the measurement shall be made from the outline of the building footprint to 3,200 feet in all directions.

(c) “Sensitive receptor” means any of the following: 

(1) A
 residence, including a private home, condominium, apartment, and living quarter.

(2) An education resource, including a preschool, school maintaining transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, daycare center, park, playground, university, and college. Where a university or college is the only sensitive receptor within 3,200 feet of the operator’s wellheads or production facilities, the university or college is not a sensitive receptor if the operator demonstrates to the division’s satisfaction that no building with nominal daily occupancy on the university or college campus is located within 3,200 feet of the operator’s wellheads or production facilities.

(3) A community resource center, including a youth center.

(4) A health care facility, including a hospital, retirement home, and
 nursing home.

(5) Live-in housing, including a long-term care hospital, hospice, prison, detention center, and dormitory.

(6) Any building housing a business that is open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------

3281.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2023, the division shall not approve any notice of intention under Section 3203 within a health protection zone, except for approvals of notices of intention necessary for any of the following purposes:

(1) To prevent or respond to a threat to public health, safety, or the environment.

(2) To comply with a court order finding that denying approval would amount to a taking of property, or a
 court order otherwise requiring approval of a notice of intention.

(3) To plug and abandon or reabandon a well, including an intercept well necessary to plug and abandon or reabandon a well.

(b) An operator who submits a notice of intention under Section 3203, except for notices of intention described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), shall submit a sensitive receptor inventory and map pursuant
 to Section 3285 of the area within the 3,200-foot radius of the wellhead or proposed wellhead location to the division with the notice of intention or a statement certifying that the operator has confirmed, and the division has verified, that there are no sensitive receptors located within 3,200 feet of the wellhead location. The operator shall submit the sensitive receptor inventory and map in a format that complies with all requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101–336) and its implementing regulations for online viewing. If the inventory or map includes any personally identifiable information, the operator shall submit a second version with the personally identifiable information redacted. Inventories and maps with no personally identifiable information shall be made available to the public in compliance with Section 3234.
 No new production facilities shall be constructed or operated in a health protection zone unless associated with a notice of intention approved pursuant to subdivision (a) or as determined by the division to be necessary to protect public health and safety.

(c) If a notice of intention is approved pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the approval shall require the operator of the oil or gas well to provide an individual indemnity bond sufficient to pay the full cost of properly plugging and abandoning the operator’s well or wells, and decommissioning any attendant production facilities in the health protection zone. The division shall determine the amount of the individual indemnity bond in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 3205.3. The bond shall be executed by the operator, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and shall be in substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3204,
 except as to the difference in the amount. The operator’s blanket indemnity bond authorized pursuant to Section 3205 shall not be used to satisfy this subdivision.

(d) Underground gas storage wells and attendant production facilities are not subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------

3281.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that development of oil and gas fields into nonfossil fuel production and injection and related uses, including, but not limited to, housing, recreation, and commercial development, may have plugged and abandoned wells or may require existing oil and gas wells to be plugged and abandoned, or replugged and abandoned, to current statutory and regulatory standards, and that the creation of health protection zones, and the related restrictions and requirements of this article, do not apply in the context of development for nonfossil fuel production and injection and related uses.

(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 3281, the division may approve notices of intention
 pursuant to Section 3203 to public and private entities who own, purchase, or lease land containing idle-deserted or previously plugged and abandoned wells for the purposes of those public and private entities plugging and abandoning, or replugging and abandoning, those oil and gas wells so development of nonfossil fuel production and injection and related uses can proceed. This may include, without limitation, a notice of intention to drill or rework an intercept well, if needed to plug and abandon or replug and abandon another well on the condition that the intercept well is itself plugged and abandoned. The public and private entities, as well as any lessees, tenants, or other occupants, shall not engage in oil or gas development or production or injection or related uses for which they have submitted a notice of intention pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (SB 1137)   Effective date (January 1, 2023) suspended pursuant to referendum petition.  Effective June 27, 2024, pursuant to withdrawal of referendum measure.)
-------------------------------------------

3282.

Commencing July 1, 2026, all oil or gas production facilities or wells with a wellhead within a health protection zone shall be in compliance with all of the following requirements:

(a) The operator is required to comply with the terms and conditions of all applicable federal, state, and local permits required to operate the well and facility.

(b) If not otherwise required by law or regulation, clearly post contact information for where to address complaints about noise, odor, and other concerns on the perimeter of
 the site. This information shall include responsible persons employed by the operator, as well as enforcement officials in the city, county, or city and county, and air district, in which the facility is located. The size and format of the posted information shall be consistent with existing requirements.

(c) Unless more stringent local requirements apply, between 8 p.m. and 7 a.m., sound levels from oil and gas production operations shall not exceed ambient noise levels, as measured at the property line.

(d) Unless more stringent local requirements apply, minimize light generated at an oil or gas well or production facility to reduce light traveling beyond property boundaries. Except as needed in emergency circumstances, operators shall use only such lighting as is necessary to provide the minimum intensity and coverage for safety and basic security between the hours of 8 p.m.
 and 7 a.m. Lighting shall be hooded or otherwise directed so that it shines onto only the operator’s property and not onto adjacent properties or into the sky.

(e) Unless more stringent local requirements apply, employ operational measures to prevent dust and particulates from migrating beyond property boundaries. Dust control measures to be employed within property boundaries shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Limiting vehicle speeds on unpaved roads to 15 miles per hour or less.

(2) Containing or covering stored sands, drilling muds, and excavated soil.

(f) Immediately suspending the use of a production facility if the production facility, including all permanent and temporary equipment within the health protection zone that
 emits vapors, such as tanks, vessels, separation facilities, gas processing units, and other equipment holding petroleum liquids or produced water, is not in compliance with all applicable air district requirements relating to preventing vapor venting to the atmosphere.

(g) (1) The operator is required to provide the division with representative chemical analyses for all produced water transported away from the oilfield where it was produced.

(2) Chemical analysis required under this subdivision shall be in accordance with the analytical specifications for liquid analysis detailed in Section 1724.7.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall be filed with the division within three months of produced water being transported from the oilfield and whenever the source of produced water is changed.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, the source of produced water is changed if the treatment process or additives are changed, if a contributing source is added or removed, or if there is a significant change to the relative contribution of individual sources such that the last chemical analysis is not representative of the produced water being transported from the oilfield.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 1.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3283.

(a) All operators with a production facility or well with a wellhead in a health protection zone shall develop a leak detection and response plan that shall be submitted to the division no later than July 1, 2028, and fully implemented by operators by July 1, 2030. For any leak detection and response plan submitted by
 July 1, 2028, the division shall either approve the plan or provide notice of deficiencies by July 1, 2029. Commencing July 1, 2030, the operator shall suspend all production and injection operations within a health protection zone unless an approved leak detection and response plan is fully implemented in that area. A leak detection and response plan is subject to review and approval by the division, in consultation with and with the concurrence of the State Air Resources Board, and shall include all of the following:

(1) The leak detection and response plan shall identify the chemical constituents, such as methane and hydrogen sulfide, as well as potential toxics of highest concern in the region as identified by the State Air Resources Board or local air district that will be detection targets for the emissions detection system to ensure early detection of leaks that otherwise may result in emissions impacting the surrounding communities. Not all chemical species that may be found in the oilfield are required to be detection targets and methane may serve as a surrogate for chemical constituents that cannot be continuously monitored but are identified in the leak detection and response plan. The State Air Resources Board and the State Water Resources Control Board shall adopt regulations as necessary to implement and set performance standards by regulation for the emissions detection system. The division, the State Air Resources Board, and the State Water
 Resources Control Board may adopt such regulations under an emergency rulemaking process as provided in Section 3288.

(2) (A) The leak detection and response plan shall include a continuously operating emissions detection system designed to provide for rapid detection of target chemical constituents to identify leaks before emissions impact the surrounding communities. Sampling locations and sample inlets shall be sited consistent with local meteorology and best practices.

(B) The emissions detection system shall include an alarm system that effectively, immediately, and reliably alerts the operator when triggered.

(C) The emissions detection system shall include a new, or use an existing, meteorological system that is appropriately sited with the ability to continuously record measurements.

(b) The leak detection and response plan shall include an alarm response protocol that provides for immediate action to rapidly identify and fix the leak that is the source of the emissions. In the event that the source of the emissions is not identified and the leak stopped within 48 hours of the leak being identified, the alarm response protocol shall include a communication plan for notification of local emergency responders and public health authorities, the division, and people in the community, including notification in languages that are easily understood by the affected community. The alarm response protocol shall provide for compliance with all local, state, and federal requirements for reporting leaks of hazardous emissions. The operator shall consult with local emergency response entities when preparing the alarm response protocol and shall engage in drills as deemed necessary by the local emergency response entity. The alarm response
 protocol shall provide for collection and determination of the chemical composition of a representative sample near the leak when a continuous alarm event indicates that emissions from the leak may have impacted the surrounding community, and the subsequent collection and determination of the chemical composition of samples when there is reason to believe that the composition of the emissions may be changing. If the source of the emissions is a leak from a well or production facility, the operator shall suspend use of the well or production facility until the leak has been corrected and the division has approved the resumption of its use. Where the operator can demonstrate to the division that the source of the emissions is not related to the oil and gas operations, the division may waive any additional actions required under the alarm response protocol.

(c) The division and the State Air Resources Board shall collaborate to develop methods for
 providing public access to data generated by operators from emissions detection systems.

(d) The division shall hold no less than three public workshops following the enactment of the emergency regulations pursuant to Section 3288 to provide information and guidance to operators and the public on the development of leak detection and response plans pursuant to this section.

(e) An operator’s leak detection and response plan shall be reviewed and updated by the operator, subject to division approval, at least once every five years from the date of its initial approval by the division. The division shall hold at least one public technical workshop at least biennially to provide information and guidance to operators on best practices for the development, review, and update of leak detection and response plans.

(f) The
 operator shall record and maintain records of emissions and meteorological monitoring, including the composition of any samples collected during leak events, for 10 years.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, commencing July 1,
 2026, and at six-month intervals thereafter, the supervisor shall notify the applicable legislative budget and policy committees on progress, including milestones, towards achieving the deadlines in subdivision (a) for the development, approval, and implementation of the leak detection and response plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 2.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3284.

(a) Before commencing any work that requires a notice of intention under Section 3203 in the health protection zone, the operator shall contact property owners and tenants within a 3,200-foot radius of the wellhead in writing with a record of delivery and offer to sample and test water wells or surface water on their property before and after drilling.

(b) The operator shall contact property owners and tenants as specified in subdivision (a) at least 30 days before commencing drilling. If a property owner or tenant requests sampling and testing of a water well or surface water, drilling may not commence until a baseline water sample has been collected, provided that the owner’s or tenant’s request is delivered in writing with a record of
 delivery to the operator within 20 days from the date notice is provided and the surface property owner makes necessary accommodations to enable the collection of a water sample within 10 days from the date notice is provided. The operator shall collect a followup water sample no sooner than 30 days, and no later than 60 days, after drilling is complete. The costs of sampling and testing required under this section shall be borne by the operator.

(c) Before commencing drilling in the health protection zone, the operator shall provide to the division documentation of the effort to identify and notify property owners and tenants as required.

(d) The operator shall conduct water sampling and testing, both baseline and followup, pursuant to this section, in accordance with all of the following requirements:

(1) Water
 quality sampling shall be conducted by appropriately qualified personnel in a manner consistent with standard environmental industry practice and chain of custody protocols. Documentation of the sampling process shall accurately describe the location that the sample was taken from and the process for collecting the sample.

(2) Water quality analytical testing shall be performed by a laboratory that has been accredited under the State Water Resources Control Board’s Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program to perform the tests necessary to complete the required analysis under this subdivision, except for those tests labeled as field tests, that may be conducted by any person qualified to sample and interpret the results of the required test.

(3) (A) Water quality testing shall include baseline measurements before the commencement of the drilling, and
 followup measurements after drilling is completed.

(B) Liquid analysis required under this subdivision shall include testing for all of the following: total dissolved solids; total petroleum hydrocarbon as crude oil; major cations (Ca, Mg, Na, K, Fe, Mn, Sr, B); major anions (CI, SO4, HCO3, CO3, Br, I, NO3); any constituents listed in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 66261.24 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations; radionuclides; appropriate indicator chemicals for drilling mud and fluids used for well cleanout; total alkalinity and hydroxide; electrical conductance; pH; and temperature.

(C) The division or the regional water
 quality control board may require testing for additional constituents on a case-by-case basis.

(4) Within 120 days after drilling in the health protection zone is complete, the results of any baseline and followup water quality testing shall be provided by the operator to the division, the appropriate regional water quality control board, the State Water Resources Control Board, the surface property owner, and the requesting tenant.

(5) The appropriate regional water quality control board shall be notified at least five working days before collecting a sample under this section so that regional water quality control board staff may witness the sampling.

(6) Water quality data collected under this section shall be submitted to the State Water Resources Control Board and the appropriate regional water quality control
 board in an electronic format that follows the guidelines detailed in Chapter 30 (commencing with Section 3890) of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations within 120 days after drilling is complete.
